Utah statutes.
77-10a-5.   Grand jurors -- Qualification and selection -- Limits on disclosure.

(1)  Grand jurors shall meet the qualifications provided for jurors generally in Title 78B, Chapter 1, Part 1, Jury and Witness Act.  Grand jurors shall be selected from the qualified jury list as provided in Section 78B-1-107.

(2)  The names of grand jurors are classified as protected records under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records and Access Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

